Washington statutes.
RCW 42.48.060

Exclusions from chapter.

Nothing in this chapter is applicable to, or in any way affects, the powers and duties of the state auditor or the joint legislative audit and review committee.

[ 1996 c 288 s 34; 1985 c 334 s 6.]